California statutes. Financial Code
(a) An association may acquire and hold stock of one or more corporations the primary activities of which are engaging in real property investment, in which event the sum of (1) investments made by an association pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, (2) any loans and guarantees extended by an association to, or for the benefit of, corporations the stock of which it holds pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, and (3) real property investments made pursuant to the authority of subdivision (b), unless a higher percentage is approved by the commissioner in writing, shall not exceed 10 percent of the total assets of
 the association.

(b) An association may engage in real property investment. The total of all real property investments made pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, unless a higher percentage is approved by the commissioner in writing, shall not exceed the total shareholders’ equity of the association.

(c) Prior to initially engaging in real property investment activities authorized by subdivision (a) or (b), an association shall make application with the commissioner for approval of its general plan of real property investment. The application for approval shall be in letter form, shall contain a copy of the general plan for real property investment as approved or adopted by the board of directors of the association, which shall include a brief description of either the activities of the corporations the association will invest in or the activities the association will
 engage in, or both, the approximate amount to be invested, the extent, if any, of diversification of those activities or investment, and the approximate date of the initial investment, and shall be signed by the chief executive officer of the association. Unless the commissioner finds (1) that the capital, assets, management, earnings, and liquidity of the association are, on a composite basis, not satisfactory or (2) that the plan for the association to engage in real property investment or to acquire and hold the stock of one or more real property investment corporations is unsafe or unsound, the commissioner shall approve the application. An application for approval shall be deemed approved on the 46th day after the application is filed with the commissioner, unless the commissioner earlier makes a final decision on the application or extends the period for approving or denying the application. For purposes of this subdivision, an application for approval shall be deemed to be filed with the commissioner
 on the date when the application, substantially in compliance with the requirements of this subdivision, is received by the commissioner. Upon the filing of the application for approval, the applicant shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) As used in this section, “real property investment” means all forms of investing in real property, whether direct or in the form of partnerships, joint ventures, or other methods of investment. It includes, but is not limited to, the purchasing, subdividing, and developing of real property or any interest therein, the building of residential housing or commercial improvements, and the owning, renting, leasing, managing, operating for income, or selling of that property.

(e) The legality of any investment lawfully made pursuant to former Section 7350, as repealed by the act enacting this section, shall not
 be affected by this section, nor shall this section be construed to require the changing of any investments lawfully made prior to January 1, 1991.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 41.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Investment in Loans [7450. - 7462.]

7450.

(a) An association may make any loan authorized by this division, but the association shall first determine that the type, amount, purpose, and repayment provisions of the loan in relation to the borrower’s resources and credit standing support the reasonable belief that the loan will be financially sound and will be repaid according to its terms, and that the loan is not otherwise unlawful.

(b) Subject to any regulations of the commissioner, an association may make or acquire loans directly or indirectly to or from any director, officer,
 affiliated person, or any parent or subsidiary. Loans made or acquired, directly or indirectly, the proceeds of which are intended to inure or have inured to the benefit of these parties are subject to the same regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 13.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

7450.2.

Except with the prior written consent of the commissioner, no association shall knowingly make:

(a) Any loan to any corporation of which 10 percent or more of the stock is owned or controlled individually or collectively by any one or more of the directors, officers, employees, or substantial stockholders of the association.

As used in this subdivision, “substantial stockholder” means a person who has a real or beneficial ownership of more than 10 percent of the outstanding stock of the association. For this purpose,
 stock owned by the person’s immediate family shall be deemed owned by that person.

(b) Any loan the proceeds of which are intended to inure to the benefit of any corporation specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1158, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

7451.

Except as otherwise provided by the commissioner, an association shall not make or acquire total loans with respect to one borrower or on one project in an amount exceeding 25 percent of the net worth of the association. As used in this section, “one borrower” has the meaning defined in Section 7453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

7452.

(a) An association may make consumer loans, provided that the total of such loans shall not exceed 30-percent of the assets of the association.

(b) An association may include loans to dealers in consumer goods to finance inventory and floor planning in the total investment as part of the 30-percent limitation described in subdivision (a). For purposes of the limitations on loans to one borrower, loans to dealers in consumer goods to finance inventory and floor planning shall be treated as commercial loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 5.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7453.

(a) An association may make, invest in, sell, purchase, participate in, or otherwise deal in secured or unsecured loans for agricultural, business, commercial, or corporate purposes, provided that the total investment in such loans does not exceed 10 percent of the assets of the association.

(b) An association may invest in, sell, purchase, participate in, or otherwise deal in loans specified in subdivision (a) which are originated by any savings association, federal association, holding company of a federally insured savings association, commercial bank, bank holding
 company, subsidiary of a bank holding company, or insurance company, provided that the total investment in such loans shall not exceed 10 percent of the association’s assets.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the term “loan” does not include any corporate debt security unless it is rated in one of the four highest rating categories by at least one nationally recognized rating service.

(d) No association shall make, invest in, purchase, or participate in a loan for agricultural, business, commercial, or corporate purposes to one borrower, except as the commissioner may approve in writing, if the sum of the amount of the association’s interest in the loan and the total balance of the association’s interest in all outstanding loans for those purposes owed to the association by that borrower exceed the greater of (1) the amount a national bank having an identical total capital and
 surplus could lend to one borrower, or (2) the amount a commercial bank, as defined in Section 105, having an identical total shareholders’ equity, capital notes, and debentures, could lend to one borrower. This subdivision shall not apply to loans (1) secured by real property, (2) sold without recourse, (3) on the security of the association’s deposit accounts, or (4) of unsecured day funds, including federal funds or similar unsecured loans.

(e) As used in this section the term “one borrower” means:

(1) Any person that is, or upon the making of a loan will become, an obligor on the loans. However, a guarantor shall not be included within the meaning of “obligor” if, in connection with a loan the association has determined, in good faith, that the primary obligor has qualified for the loan irrespective of the existence of the guarantor. In the case of a loan that has been assumed
 by a third party with the consent of the association, the former debtor and any guarantor shall not be deemed to be an “obligor.”

(2) Nominees of the obligor.

(3) All persons, trusts, syndicates, partnerships and corporations of which the obligor is a nominee, a beneficiary, a member, a general partner, a limited partner owning an interest of 10 percent or more based on the value of his or her capital contribution, or a record or beneficial stockholder owning 10 percent or more of the capital stock.

(4) If the obligor is a trust, syndicate, partnership or corporation, all trusts, syndicates, partnerships and corporations of which any beneficiary, member, general partner, limited partner owning an interest of 10 percent or more based on the value of his or her capital contribution, or record or beneficial stockholder
 owning 10 percent or more of the capital stock, is also a beneficiary, member, general partner, limited partner owning an interest of 10 percent or more based on the value of his or her capital contribution, or record or beneficial stockholder owning 10 percent or more of the capital stock of the obligor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

7454.

Each association is authorized to issue credit cards, extend credit in connection with the cards, and otherwise engage in or participate in credit card operations. The provisions of Title 2 (commencing with Section 1801) of the Civil Code shall not apply to any credit extended by an association pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 12.4.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7455.

No association or director, officer, or employee of an association shall require, as a condition to the granting of any loan or the extension of any other service by the association, that the borrower or any other person undertake a contract of insurance with any specific company, agency, or individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 27.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7456.

Any loan commitment made by an association shall be counted as an investment and shall be included in total assets of the association only to the extent that funds have been advanced (and not repaid) pursuant to the commitment. For the purposes of this section, the term “loan commitment” includes a loan in process, a letter of credit, or any other commitment to extend credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 7.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7457.

An association may make loans on the security of its savings accounts, whether or not the borrower is the owner of the account, subject to the limitations of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 11.2.)
-------------------------------------------

7458.

An association may make overdraft loans specifically related to transaction accounts, subject to regulations issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 11.3.)
-------------------------------------------

7459.

In addition to establishing reserves pursuant to Section 6476, an association or federal association, as defined in Section 5102, may establish a separate loan reserve account regarding losses resulting from fraud by a borrower and may recover any of those losses from that borrower.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7460.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other provision of law to the contrary, an association, a federal association, an affiliate of an association or federal association, a service corporation, or any successor in interest thereto, that originates, acquires, or purchases, in whole or in part, any loan secured directly or collaterally, in whole or in part, by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property, or any interest therein, may bring an action for recovery of damages, including exemplary damages not to exceed 50 percent of the actual damages, against a borrower where the action is based on fraud
 under Section 1572 of the Civil Code and the fraudulent conduct by the borrower induced the original lender to make that loan.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to loans secured by single-family, owner-occupied residential real property, when the property is actually occupied by the borrower as represented to the lender in order to obtain the loan and the loan is for an amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, as adjusted annually, commencing on January 1, 1987, to the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor.

(c) Any action maintained under this section for damages shall not constitute a money judgment for deficiency or a deficiency judgment within the meaning of Section 580a, 580b, or 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7461.

The provisions of any deed of trust or mortgage on real property which authorize an association, federal association, affiliate or service corporation of an association or federal association, or any successor in interest thereto, to accelerate the maturity date of the principal and interest on any loan secured thereby or to exercise any power of sale or other remedy contained therein upon the failure of the trustor or mortgagor to pay, at the times provided for under the terms of the deed of trust or mortgage, any taxes, rents, assessments, or insurance premiums with respect to the property or the loan, or any advances made by the association, federal
 association, affiliate or service corporation of an association or federal association, or any successor in interest thereto, shall be enforceable whether or not impairment of the security interest in the property has resulted from the failure of the trustor or mortgagor to so pay the taxes, rents, assessments, insurance premiums, or advances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7462.

The provisions of any deed of trust or mortgage on real property which authorize an association, federal association, affiliate or service corporation of an association or federal association, or any successor in interest thereto, to receive and control the disbursement of the proceeds of any policy of fire, flood, or other hazard insurance respecting the property shall be enforceable whether or not impairment of the security interest in the property has resulted from the event that caused the proceeds of the insurance policy to become payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 397, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Real Estate Loans [7500. - 7509.]

7500.

(a) Subject to limitations, if any, within this chapter, an association may originate, invest in, sell, purchase, service, participate, or otherwise deal in (including brokerage or warehousing) loans, including construction loans, made on the security of residential or nonresidential real property, or interests in these loans.

(b) No investment in real property or a real estate loan shall be made by an association until one or more written appraisal reports, prepared at the request of an association or its agent, have been submitted to the association by a person or
 persons meeting the qualification standards for an appraiser as set forth in the commissioner’s regulations. No commitment to disburse shall be made by the association until the person or persons have been duly appointed and qualified as appraisers by the association. Such a person or persons shall have made a physical inspection and submitted to the association a fully documented appraisal of the real estate that would secure the loan or constitute the investment, or, in the case of a purchased loan, the person or persons have reviewed and approved an appraisal report in support of the loan. If the balance of any purchased loan is one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, the person or persons reviewing and approving the appraisal report shall have inspected the real estate. Each appraisal report submitted to an association pursuant to this subdivision shall be signed and shall include the tax identification number, social security number, or other form of verifiable identification of the person or persons
 signing the appraisal report.

(c) For the purpose of determining appraised value, unimproved property without offsite improvements shall be evaluated as though offsite improvements have been installed if a subdivision map has been recorded and a bond or other instrument guaranteeing installation of the offsite improvements has been accepted by the governing authorities in connection with the recording of the subdivision map.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.

Each real estate loan shall be evidenced by a note or instrument of obligation for the amount of the loan. The note or instrument shall specify the amount and terms of repayment including any penalty or charge for late payment, and may contain all other terms of the loan contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.

(a) Each real estate loan shall be secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or other transaction or instrument constituting a lien or claim, or its equivalent, upon the real estate securing the loan, according to any lawful and recognized practice that is suited to the transaction. Any deed of trust or other instrument or transaction constituting a lien or claim is included in the term “mortgage” in this division.

(b) A mortgage shall provide specifically for full protection to the association with respect to the loan and additional advances, including any terms and
 conditions that the association deems necessary and appropriate to state the agreement between the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.

Except as specified by the loan contract or by Section 2954.8 of the Civil Code, an association shall have no obligation to pay interest to the borrower upon funds credited to an impound, trust, or other type of account for payment of taxes, insurance, or other charges relating to the property, or to invest them for the benefit of the borrower, unless the funds have been placed in an interest bearing savings account under the terms of the loan contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 29.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an association may adjust the interest rate, payment, balance, or term-to-maturity on any loan secured by real property as authorized by the loan contract, and may receive a portion of the consideration for making a real estate loan in the form of a percentage of the amount by which the current market value of the property during the loan term or at maturity exceeds the original appraised value, subject to the limitations of subdivision (b) and Section 341 of P.L. 97-320 (H.R. 6267, the Garn-St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982).

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Fully amortized loan” means a loan in which, at inception of the loan, the entire principal balance, together with accrued interest, shall be payable with the scheduled term of the loan in substantially equal installments (excepting the last payment, which may be smaller than a regular scheduled payment).

(2) “Home loans” means loans made on the security of one- to four-unit residential dwellings (including condominiums and cooperatives), combinations of these dwellings and business property (where no more than 20 percent of the total appraised value of the real estate is attributable to the business use), farm residences and combinations of farm residences and commercial farm real property.

(3) “Nonamortized loan” means a loan in which none of the principal
 balance shall be payable prior to the maturity of the loan.

(4) “Open end line of credit” means a loan plan in which the association reasonably contemplates repeated transactions; the association may impose interest from time to time on the unpaid principal of the loan plan, and the amount of credit that may be extended to the borrower during the term of the loan plan (up to any limit set by the association) is generally made available to the extent that any outstanding principal balance is repaid.

(5) “Partially amortized loan” means a loan in which some but not all of the principal balance, together with accrued interest, shall be payable prior to the maturity of the loan.

(6) “Reverse annuity mortgage” means an instrument which provides for periodic payments to be made to a homeowner based on accumulated equity.
 The payments are made monthly directly by the association, or are made through the purchase of an annuity from an insurance company. The loan becomes due on a specified date after disbursement of the entire principal amount of the loan or when a specified event occurs, such as sale of the property or death of the borrower. The interest rate on this instrument may be fixed, or may be adjusted periodically as provided by this section.

(b) Adjustments to the interest rate, payment, balance, or term-to-maturity on home loans shall be subject to the limitations of this subdivision.

(1) The loan term shall not exceed 40 years, with interest payable at least semiannually, except as expressly authorized by this section.

(2) The loan balance for other than nonamortized and open end line of credit loans shall be repayable in
 at least semiannual installments; provided, that loans on the security of farm residences and combinations of farm residences and commercial farm real property may be repayable in annual installments.

(3) The loan may be fully amortized, partially amortized, nonamortized, a reverse annuity mortgage, or an open end line of credit loan. The loan contract may provide for the deferral of principal and capitalization of a portion of interest, or of all interest, in the case of loans to natural persons secured by borrower-occupied real property and on which periodic advances are being made.

(4) (A) At origination, the loan-to-value ratio may not exceed the maximum permitted by Section 7509, as determined by the association’s board of directors (but not more than 100 percent). During the term of the loan, the loan-to-value ratio may increase above the maximum
 percentage otherwise permissible if the increase results from an adjustment described in paragraph (3) or (5). The commissioner shall assume continued compliance with applicable loan-to-value limitations where the original loan-to-value ratio met the requirements of this paragraph, but in no event may the loan balance exceed 125 percent of the original appraised value of the security property during the term of the loan unless pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) or unless the loan contract provides that the payment shall be adjusted at least once every five years, beginning no later than the 10th year of the loan, to a level sufficient to amortize the loan at the then existing interest rate and loan balance over the remaining term of the loan. However, this 125 percent limitation shall not apply to the portion of a loan balance that is interest received in the form of a percentage of the appreciation in value of the security property.

(B) If, at maturity of a loan secured by a home that provides for adjustments pursuant to paragraph (3) or (5), the ratio of the loan balance to the current market value of the security property exceeds the maximum permissible amount under Section 7509, the association may offer to refinance the loan if (i) the refinanced loan complies with subdivision (b) of Section 7509 and (ii) the loan contract for the refinanced loan requires that, in addition to full or partial amortization of the loan, the pro rata portion, based on the number of installments due annually, of estimated annual taxes and assessments on the security property be paid in advance to the association with each installment payment.

(5) For any home loan secured by borrower-occupied property or property to be occupied by the borrower, adjustments to the interest rate, payment, balance, or term-to-maturity shall comply
 with the limitations of this paragraph.

(A) Adjustments to the interest rate shall correspond directly to the movement of an interest rate index or of a national or regional index that measures the rate of inflation or the rate of change in consumer disposable income, which index is readily available to, and verifiable by, the borrower and is beyond the direct control of the association. An association also may increase the interest rate pursuant to a formula or schedule that specifies the amount of the increase and the time at which it may be made and which is set forth in the loan contract. An association, in its sole discretion, may decrease the interest rate at any time.

(B) Adjustments to the payment and the loan balance that do not reflect an interest rate adjustment may be made if: (i) the adjustments reflect a change in a national or regional index that measures the rate
 of inflation or the rate of change in consumer disposable income, is readily available to and verifiable by the borrower, and is beyond the direct control of the association; (ii) in the case of a payment adjustment, the adjustment reflects a change in the loan balance or is made pursuant to a formula, or to a schedule specifying the percentage or dollar change in the payment as set forth in the loan contract; or (iii) in the case of an open end line of credit loan, the adjustment reflects an advance taken by the borrower under the line of credit, or a payment made by the borrower, that is permitted by the loan contract.

(C) Any combination of indices or a moving average of index values may be used as an index, and an association (i) may use more than one index during the term of a loan, if set forth in the loan contract and (ii) may provide for the selection of a substitute index by the association in the event the index being used is no
 longer available to or verifiable by the borrower or as otherwise provided in the loan contract.

(D) The loan term may be adjusted only to reflect a change in the interest rate, the payment or the loan balance. A loan contract may provide an association with the right to call the loan due and payable either after a specified period of time has elapsed following the date of the loan contract or as specified in a reverse annuity mortgage.

(6) For any home loan secured by borrower-occupied property and on which the interest rate may be adjusted pursuant to paragraph (5), an association may not impose a prepayment charge on any prepayment made within 90 days of a required notice of an interest-rate increase with respect to the loan.

(c) Disclosure and notices for loans made pursuant to this section shall comply with the
 regulations codified in Section 563.99 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 43.5.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an association may originate, invest in, sell, purchase, service, participate, or otherwise deal in loans (including construction loans) on the security of real property for primarily residential (other than a one- to four-unit dwelling) or nonresidential use, subject to the limitations of this article.

(b) An association’s aggregate investment in real property loans for primarily nonresidential use under this section shall not exceed 40 percent of assets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.5.

(a) A savings association may make loans the principal purpose of which is to provide financing with respect to what is, or what is to become, primarily residential real estate, for which the association relies substantially on the borrower’s general credit standing and projected future income for repayment, without other security, or relies on other assurances for repayment, including guarantees or other obligations of third parties.

(b) An association’s aggregate investment in residential real estate loans described in subdivision (a) shall not exceed an amount
 equal to 5 percent of the association’s assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, an association may make a loan secured by an assignment of a loan or loans to the extent that it could, under applicable law and regulations, make or purchase the underlying assigned loan or loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1176, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.

(a) An association may make loans or advances of credit, or invest in interests therein, on the security of real property, which loans, advances of credit, or investments are not otherwise authorized under the law because of the following reasons:

(1) The loan-to-value ratio, stated maturity, or loan amount is in excess of the maximum allowable limits.

(2) Lack of any required borrower certification or required private mortgage insurance.

(3) The loan would cause an applicable percentage-of-assets category to be exceeded.

(4) A combination of the foregoing factors.

(b) Investments made under the authority of this section are subject to the following restrictions:

(1) No association shall have investments under this section aggregating at any one time more than 5 percent of its total assets.

(2) Each investment made under this section shall be fully documented to support the conclusion that it was made on a prudent basis.

(3) Loans made pursuant to this section shall comply with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5), and paragraph (6), of subdivision (b), of Section 7504, where applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.

(a) (1) At the time of origination, a real estate loan may not exceed 100 percent of the market value of security property. An association shall, by vote of its board of directors, establish maximum loan-to-value ratios for loans made on the security of real estate, and the resolution adopting those ratios shall be included in the minutes of the directors’ meeting. Home loans, as defined in Section 7504, made on the combined security of real estate and savings accounts may be made in excess of the maximum
 loan-to-value ratios adopted pursuant to this subdivision with the excess secured by the savings account.

(2) However, for loans originated in excess of 90 percent of the initial appraised value of the security property, the savings account shall consist only of funds belonging to the borrower, the borrower’s family, or the borrower’s employer, and the loans shall not exceed the appraised value of the real estate.

(b) With respect to home loans originated or refinanced in excess of 90 percent of the appraised value of the security property, that part of the unpaid balance that exceeds 80 percent of the property value shall be insured or guaranteed by a mortgage insurance company that the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation has determined to be a “qualified private insurer.”

(c) With respect to all other loans on
 the security of real estate originated in excess of 90 percent of the appraised value of the security property, an association’s board of directors shall approve each of these loans prior to its origination and that approval shall be recorded in the minutes of its meeting.

(d) An association shall not make a loan secured by unimproved real property if the loan-to-value ratio would exceed 80 percent of the appraised value of the unimproved real property securing the loan.

(e) In determining compliance with maximum loan-to-value-ratio limitations for real estate loans, at the time of making a loan, an association shall add together the unpaid amount, or in the case of a line-of-credit loan, the approved credit limit, of all recorded loans secured by prior mortgages, liens, or other encumbrances on the security property that would have priority over the association’s lien, and shall
 not make the loan unless the total amount of those loans, including the loan to be made but excluding loans that will be paid off out of the proceeds of the new loan, does not exceed the applicable maximum loan-to-value-ratio limitations prescribed in this subdivision. In determining the value of the real estate security, an association shall use the current appraised value of the security property, which may include any expected value of improvements to be financed.

(f) “Value” for a real estate loan means the market value of the real estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Successors in Interest in Loans [7600. - 7600.]

7600.

In the case of any investment made by an association in a real estate loan, in the event all or part of the ownership of the real estate security becomes vested in a person other than the party or parties originally executing the security instruments and if there is not an agreement in writing to the contrary, an association may, without notice to the party or parties, deal with a successor in interest to the mortgage and debt in the same manner as with the original party or parties, and may forbear to sue or may extend time for payment of or otherwise modify
 the terms of the debt, without discharging or in any way affecting the original liability of the party or parties or their debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Salvage of Loans and Investments [7650. - 7650.]

7650.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this division or the laws of this state shall be construed as denying to an association the right to invest its funds, operate a business, manage or deal in property, or take any other action over whatever period of time may reasonably be necessary to avoid loss on a loan or investment made or an obligation created in good faith.

(b) Associations which do not meet the requirements of Section 6475, or have been issued an order pursuant to Section 8200, shall not take any action pursuant
 to this section without first obtaining approval, in writing, from the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 12.7.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Usury Exemption [7675. - 7675.]

7675.

(a) Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligations of, loans made or arranged by, or forbearances of, an association; a federal association; a qualified foreign savings association; an entity that is a savings and loan holding company; a subsidiary of a savings and loan holding company that is not an association; or a service corporation which is a subsidiary of an association, a federal association, or a qualified foreign savings
 association. As used in this section, the terms “savings and loan holding company” and “subsidiary” mean a savings and loan holding company or a subsidiary, as defined in Section 10 of the Home Owners Loan Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1467a), and the term “service corporation” means a service corporation described in Section 5(c)(4)(B) of the Home Owners’ Loan Act of 1933 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1464), as amended, or Section 7252, or a wholly owned subsidiary referred to in Section 7300.

(b) Subdivision (a) creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (a) does not exempt an association; a federal association; a foreign savings association; a savings and loan holding company, a subsidiary of a savings and loan holding company; a service corporation which is a subsidiary of an association; a federal association, or foreign
 savings association from complying with all other law and regulations governing the business in which the association, federal association, foreign savings association, savings and loan holding company, subsidiary of a savings and loan holding company, or service corporation which is a subsidiary of an association, a federal association, or a foreign savings association is engaged.

(c) For purposes of this section, “foreign savings association” means a foreign savings association as defined in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10000) or Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 10010) and “qualified foreign savings association” means a foreign savings association that has been authorized to conduct the business of an association in this state by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 46.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Finance Leasing [7700.3. - 7704.]

7700.3.

An association may engage in leasing activities that are the functional equivalent of lending, subject to the limitations of Sections 7701 to 7704, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 13.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.

An association may become the legal or beneficial owner of tangible personal property or real property for the purpose of leasing such property, may obtain an assignment of a lessor’s interest in a lease of such property, and may incur obligations incidental to its position as the legal or beneficial owner and lessor of the leased property, if:

(1) The lease is a net, full-payout lease representing a noncancelable obligation of the lessee, notwithstanding the possible early termination of the lease. 

(2) At the expiration of the lease, the association’s interest in the property shall be liquidated or released on a net basis as soon as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 8.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

(a) A lease of tangible personal property made to a natural person for personal, family, or household purposes pursuant to this section shall be subject to all limitations applicable to the amount of an association’s investment in consumer loans.
